Oklahoma, session 2025, SB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 324.11, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 311, O.S.L. 2022 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 324.11), is amended to read as follows:


Section 324.11. A. No person, firm, corporation, partnership,


organization, city, town, school district, county, or other


subdivision of government shall commence the construction or major


alteration of any buildings or structures that are classified as


occupancies in the building codes adopted by the Oklahoma Uniform


Building Code Commission including all defined occupancies within


these groups, or install original equipment for the operation or

Req. No. 153 Page 1


maintenance thereof without obtaining a permit. The permit, for


which a charge may be made in conformity with the local ordinance,


except as limited herein as to governmental agencies, shall be


obtained from the city, town, or county in whose jurisdiction the


construction or alteration is planned.


B. All such construction or alteration so planned shall conform


to the applicable provisions of the building code, as last adopted


by the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission.


C. Application for such building permit shall be made to, and


such building permit shall be issued by, any city, town, or county


in whose jurisdiction the construction or alteration is planned.


The city, town, or county may require the submission of plans and


specifications covering the proposed construction or alteration and


may refuse to issue such permit unless the work so planned is in


accordance with the applicable provisions of the city, town, or


county’s building code. Any city, town, or county that requires the


submission of plans and specifications may provide for review of


plans by an entity approved by the city, town, or county.


D. In all geographical areas wherein where no such permit is


required by local authorities such pursuant to this section, the


permit must shall be obtained from either the State Fire Marshal,


who may require the submission of plans and specifications covering


the proposed construction or alteration, and shall refuse to issue


such permit unless the work so planned is in accordance with the

Req. No. 153 Page 2


applicable provisions of the International Building Code,


International Existing Building Code, and International Fire Code,


as last adopted by the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission;


provided, that the foregoing or an entity approved by the State Fire


Marshal that provides plan review services. The State Fire Marshal


shall promulgate rules to enact the provisions of this subsection.


E. The State Fire Marshal shall provide approval or disapproval


of a permit received under the provisions of subsection D of this


section no more than ninety (90) days after receipt. Disapproval of


a permit must include written notice to the applicant identifying


the specific features that do not comply with the applicable codes,


as well as the specific code chapters and sections. If no written


notice for a disapproval is provided within the ninety (90) days,


the permit shall be deemed approved, and any necessary permit shall


be issued by the State Fire Marshal on the next business day.


F. The provisions of this sentence subsections C and D of this


section shall not apply to locations in any geographical area that


are owned or operated by a state beneficiary public trust or have


been purchased or leased from a state beneficiary public trust.


Furthermore, nothing in this subsection D of this section shall be


construed as requiring a person to obtain a permit from the State


Fire Marshal for the construction or alteration of a single-family


dwelling, duplex residential dwelling, barn, shed, or carport


attached to a single-family dwelling, or duplex residential dwelling

Req. No. 153 Page 3


when such structure is located in an unincorporated area of a


county.


D. G. Nothing in Section 324.1 et seq. of this title shall be


construed as repealing any ordinance of any city or town or any


order of any county requiring the submission to the local


authorities of plans and specifications and the obtaining of


permits, but the power or authority of any such city, town, or


county to levy or assess any charge for such permit or to make and


enforce requirements prerequisite to the issuance of such permit,


other than requiring compliance with such building code, shall, as


to governmental agencies, be limited as hereinafter set forth.


E. H. No city, town, or county requested to issue any such


permit to any city, town, school district, county, or other


subdivision of government shall charge, assess, or collect any fee


or other charge for such permit except the regular and customary


inspection fees fixed by ordinance for inspection of the work to be


done under such permit, and no other charge, fee, or other


conditions of any kind under the authority of this title shall be


made a condition of or prerequisite to the obtaining of such permit


by any such governmental agency.


F. I. No bids may be let for the construction or major


alteration of any correctional facility as defined by Section 317 of


this title until plans and specifications for such construction or


alteration have been submitted to the State Fire Marshal for

Req. No. 153 Page 4


approval. The State Fire Marshal shall approve the plans and


specifications if the work so planned conforms with the applicable


provisions of the building code, as last adopted by the Oklahoma


Uniform Building Code Commission.


G. J. 1. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the fire


code and/or or building code, as last adopted by the Oklahoma


Uniform Building Code Commission, all facilities to be licensed as


assisted living facilities, or additions to existing assisted living


facilities, constructed after November 1, 2008, shall be constructed


with the guidelines of the in accordance with the building


guidelines set forth in the building code for I-II building


occupancies if at any time in their operation they house residents


who are not capable of responding to emergency situations without


physical assistance from staff of the facility or are not capable of


self-preservation.


2. Assisted living facilities licensed prior to July 1, 2008,


may house residents who are not capable of responding to emergency


situations without physical assistance from the staff or are not


capable of self-preservation under the following conditions: As


part of the annual licensure renewal process, the facility shall


disclose if any residents who reside in the facility are not capable


of responding to emergency situations without physical assistance


from staff or are not capable of self-preservation, and the facility


shall be required to install fire sprinkler protection and an alarm

Req. No. 153 Page 5


system within the facility in accordance with the building


guidelines set forth in the building code for I-II facilities.


3. Assisted living facilities licensed to house six or fewer


residents prior to July 1, 2008, shall be permitted to install


National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 13D or 13R fire


sprinkler protection in lieu of meeting I-II sprinkler requirements,


with approval of the municipal fire marshal or compliance with local


codes.


4. For purposes of this subsection:


a. the term “assisted living center” shall include an


assisted living center licensed as such by the State


Department of Health and the assisted living center


component of a continuum care facility licensed by the


State Department of Health, and


b. the terms “fire code” and “building code” shall be


deemed to include:


(1) any and all appendices, commentary, amendments


and supplements to, and replacements or


restatements of, the Codes codes, and


(2) any and all other laws, ordinances, regulations,


codes, or standards pertaining to assisted living


center construction, occupancy, and maintenance


for the protection of lives and property from


fire.

Req. No. 153 Page 6


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-153 MSBB 12/30/2024 10:35:03 AM





































Req. No. 153 Page 7